Hawaii statutes.
[§708-839.8] Identity theft in the
third degree. (1) A person commits the offense of identity theft in the
third degree if that person makes or causes to be made, either directly or
indirectly, a transmission of any personal information of another by any oral
statement, any written statement, or any statement conveyed by any electronic
means, with the intent to commit the offense of theft in the third or fourth
degree from any person or entity.

(2) Identity theft in the third degree is a
class C felony. [L 2002, c 224, pt of §1]

Case Notes

As this section does not require impersonation of a person in
order to constitute the offense, only the transmission of a person's personal
information with the intent to commit the specified theft offense, the circuit
court erred in its construction of this section. 125 H. 172 (App.), 254 P.3d 483
(2011).

COMMENTARY ON §§708-839.6 TO 708-839.8

Act 224, Session Laws 2002, added these sections to provide
criminal penalties for persons who commit identity theft of another
individual. The legislature found that misappropriation of personal
identification information was on the rise. Act 224 addresses the criminal
conduct associated with intentional identity theft. Conference Committee
Report No. 25-02.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next